Texas, session 892, HB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle A, Title 9, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Chapter 762 to read as follows: CHAPTER 762. CAMPGROUNDS Sec. 762.001.  DEFINITION.  In this chapter, "campground" means a commercial property designed to provide cabins for transient guest use or areas for locating recreational vehicles or tents for transient guest use. Sec. 762.002.  FLOOD RISK NOTICE. The owner or operator of a campground located on or near a body of water that is at risk of flooding shall before each camper is allowed access to the campground: (1)  provide written notice to the camper, or the parent or legal guardian of a camper who is a minor, of the risk of flooding at the campground; and (2)  ensure the camper, or the parent or legal guardian of a camper who is a minor, signs and submits to the owner or operator a statement acknowledging receipt of the notice. Sec. 762.003.  CIVIL PENALTY. (a) An owner or operator of a campground who fails to comply with Section 762.002 is liable to this state for a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation.  Each day a violation continues constitutes a separate violation. (b)  The attorney general may sue to collect the penalty and may recover attorney's fees and costs incurred in bringing an action under this section. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.